test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vaddu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - kussâ:
    kussâ+N+Sg+Nom: kussâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuusân # lâi: kuus7ân
    kussâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuusâst
    kussâ+N+Sg+Com: kussáin
    kussâ+N+Sg+Abe: kusâttáá
    kussâ+N+Ess: kussân
    kussâ+N+Par: kussâd
    kussâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuusah
    kussâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuusâi, kusâi]
    kussâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuusâid
    kussâ+N+Pl+Ill: kussáid
    kussâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuusâin
    kussâ+N+Pl+Com: [kusâiguin, kusâigijn]
    kussâ+N+Pl+Abe: kusâittáá

  Noun - pakkâ:
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Nom: pakkâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Gen: paakâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Acc: paakâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Ill: paakân
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Loc: paakâst
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Com: pakkáin
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Abe: pakâttáá
    pakkâ+N+Ess: pakkân
    pakkâ+N+Par: pakkâd
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Nom: paakah
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [paakâi, pakâi]
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Acc: paakâid
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Ill: pakkáid
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Loc: paakâin
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Com: [pakâiguin, pakâigijn]
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Abe: pakâittáá

  Noun - sekkâ:
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Nom: sekkâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Gen: seehâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Acc: seehâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Ill: seekân
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Loc: seehâst
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Com: sehháin
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Abe: sehâttáá
    sekkâ+N+Ess: sekkân
    sekkâ+N+Par: sekkâd
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Nom: seehah
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [seehâi, sehâi]
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Acc: seehâid
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Ill: sehháid
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Loc: seehâin
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Com: [sehâiguin, sehâigijn]
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Abe: sehâittáá

  Noun - loppâ:
    loppâ+N+Sg+Nom: loppâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Gen: loopâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Acc: loopâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Ill: loopân
    loppâ+N+Sg+Loc: loopâst
    loppâ+N+Sg+Com: loppáin
    loppâ+N+Sg+Abe: lopâttáá
    loppâ+N+Ess: loppân
    loppâ+N+Par: loppâd
    loppâ+N+Pl+Nom: loopah
    loppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [loopâi, lopâi]
    loppâ+N+Pl+Acc: loopâid
    loppâ+N+Pl+Ill: loppáid
    loppâ+N+Pl+Loc: loopâin
    loppâ+N+Pl+Com: [lopâiguin, lopâigijn]
    loppâ+N+Pl+Abe: lopâittáá

  Noun - pennâ:
    pennâ+N+Sg+Nom: pennâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Gen: peenâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Acc: peenâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Ill: peenân
    pennâ+N+Sg+Loc: peenâst
    pennâ+N+Sg+Com: pennáin
    pennâ+N+Sg+Abe: penâttáá
    pennâ+N+Ess: pennân
    pennâ+N+Par: pennâd
    pennâ+N+Pl+Nom: peenah
    pennâ+N+Pl+Gen: [peenâi, penâi]
    pennâ+N+Pl+Acc: peenâid
    pennâ+N+Pl+Ill: pennáid
    pennâ+N+Pl+Loc: peenâin
    pennâ+N+Pl+Com: [penâiguin, penâigijn]
    pennâ+N+Pl+Abe: penâittáá

  Noun - skammâ:
    skammâ+N+Sg+Nom: skammâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Gen: skaamâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Acc: skaamâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Ill: skaamân
    skammâ+N+Sg+Loc: skaamâst
    skammâ+N+Sg+Com: skammáin
    skammâ+N+Sg+Abe: skamâttáá
    skammâ+N+Ess: skammân
    skammâ+N+Par: skammâd
    skammâ+N+Pl+Nom: skaamah
    skammâ+N+Pl+Gen: [skaamâi, skamâi]
    skammâ+N+Pl+Acc: skaamâid
    skammâ+N+Pl+Ill: skammáid
    skammâ+N+Pl+Loc: skaamâin
    skammâ+N+Pl+Com: [skamâiguin, skamâigijn]
    skammâ+N+Pl+Abe: skamâittáá

  Noun - vahtâ:
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Nom: vahtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaavtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaavtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaahtân
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaavtâst
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Com: vavttáin
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Abe: vavtâttáá
    vahtâ+N+Ess: vahtân
    vahtâ+N+Par: vahtâd
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaavtah
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaavtâi, vavtâi]
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaavtâid
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Ill: vavttáid
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaavtâin
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Com: [vavtâiguin, vavtâigijn]
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Abe: vavtâittáá

  Noun - párkku: # ok 
    párkku+N+Sg+Nom:  párkku
    párkku+N+Sg+Gen:  páárhu
    párkku+N+Sg+Acc:  páárhu
    párkku+N+Sg+Ill:  páárkun
    párkku+N+Sg+Loc:  páárhust
    párkku+N+Sg+Com:  párhoin
    párkku+N+Sg+Abe:  párhuttáá
    párkku+N+Ess:  párkkun
    párkku+N+Par:  párkkud
    párkku+N+Pl+Nom:  páárhuh
    párkku+N+Pl+Gen: [páárhui, párhui]
    párkku+N+Pl+Acc:  páárhuid
    párkku+N+Pl+Ill:  párhoid
    párkku+N+Pl+Loc:  páárhuin
    párkku+N+Pl+Com:  [párhuiguin, párhuigijn]
    párkku+N+Pl+Abe:  párhuittáá

  Noun - ijjâ: # ok 
    ijjâ+N+Sg+Nom:  ijjâ
    ijjâ+N+Sg+Gen:  iijâ

  
